fi: Alavirran porttityypit: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-korttipaikka; SD-korttipaikka; USB micro-B; USB mini-B; USB type-A; USB type-C; VGA; Muu
sl-SI: Tipi izhodnih vrat: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Reža za kartico MicroSD; Reža za kartico SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tipa C; VGA; Drugo
zh-CN: 下游端口类型: DisplayPort; 以太网 (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD 卡槽; SD卡槽; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A 型; USB C 型; VGA; 其他
pl: Typy portów wyjściowych: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Gniazdo karty MicroSD; Gniazdo karty SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu C; VGA; Inne
zh-TW: 下游埠類型: DisplayPort; 乙太網路 (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD 記憶卡插槽; SD 記憶卡插槽; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; 其他
hu: Kimenetiport-típusok: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD kártyanyílás; SD kártyanyílás; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-A; USB-C; VGA; Egyéb
de: Nachgelagerte Port-Typen: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-Kartensteckplatz; SD-Kartensteckplatz; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-C; VGA; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทพอร์ตดาวน์สตรีม: DisplayPort; อีเธอร์เน็ต (RJ-45); HDMI; ช่องใส่การ์ด MicroSD; ช่องใส่การ์ด SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipos de portas downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Slot para cartão MicroSD; Slot para cartão SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; Outro
el: Τύποι θυρών downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Υποδοχή κάρτας MicroSD; Υποδοχή κάρτας SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Άλλο
en: Downstream port types: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD card slot; SD card slot; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Other
tr: Alt bağlantı noktası tipleri: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD kart yuvası; SD kart yuvası; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Tip-A; USB Tip-C; VGA; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipos de portas downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Ranhura para cartão MicroSD; Ranhura para cartão SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; Outro
ja: ダウンストリームポートタイプ: DisplayPort; イーサネット (RJ-45); HDMI; microSDカードスロット; SDカードスロット; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; その他
it: Tipi di porte downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Slot scheda MicroSD; Slot scheda SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; Altro
sv: Nedströmsporttyper: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-kortplats; SD-kortplats; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ-A; USB typ-C; VGA; Övrigt
fr: Types de ports en aval: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Emplacement pour carte MicroSD; Emplacement pour carte SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type A; USB type C; VGA; Autre
ro-RO: Tipuri de porturi downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Slot card MicroSD; Slot card SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip A; USB tip C; VGA; Altele
lt-LT: Išvesties prievadų tipai: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD kortelės lizdas; SD kortelės lizdas; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB A tipo; USB C tipo; VGA; Kita
es: Tipos de puertos downstream: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Ranura para tarjeta MicroSD; Ranura para tarjeta SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; VGA; Otros
sk-SK: Typy výstupných portov: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Slot pre MicroSD kartu; Slot pre SD kartu; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typu A; USB typu C; VGA; Iné
nl: Typen downstream-poorten: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-kaartsleuf; SD-kaartsleuf; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Andere
hr-HR: Tipovi nizvodnih portova: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Utor za MicroSD karticu; Utor za SD karticu; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB tip-A; USB tip-C; VGA; Ostalo
vi: Loại cổng đầu ra: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Khe thẻ MicroSD; Khe thẻ SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Khác
ko: 다운스트림 포트 유형: 디스플레이포트; 이더넷 (RJ-45); HDMI; 마이크로SD 카드 슬롯; SD 카드 슬롯; USB 마이크로-B; USB 미니-B; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-C; VGA; 기타
ru: Типы нисходящих портов: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Слот для карты MicroSD; Слот для карты SD; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Другой
nb: Nedstrømsporttyper: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-kortspor; SD-kortspor; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Annet
cs: Typy výstupních portů: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Slot pro MicroSD kartu; Slot pro SD kartu; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB typ A; USB typ C; VGA; Jiné
da: Downstream-porttyper: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; MicroSD-kortplads; SD-kortplads; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Andet
bg-BG: Типове изходни портове: DisplayPort; Ethernet (RJ-45); HDMI; Слот за MicroSD карта; Слот за SD карта; USB Micro-B; USB Mini-B; USB type-A; USB Type-C; VGA; Други